resources/code/final/final.lexc
LEXICON Root

Noun ;
PNoun ;
Verb ;
Det ;
Compl ;
Prep ;
WH ;

LEXICON Noun

spy   NCat;
doctor   NCat;

LEXICON PNoun

harry   PNCat;
sally   PNCat;
alice   PNCat;
vertigo PNCat;


LEXICON NCat

+n:0 NNum;

LEXICON PNCat

+pn+sg+num:0 NCase;

LEXICON NNum
+sg+num:0 NCase;
+pl+num:^s NCase;

LEXICON NCase

+acc+case:0 #;
+nom+case:0 #;

LEXICON Verb

talk  VCat;
walk  VCat;
like  VCat;
beg   VCat;
make  VCat;
panic VCat;
try   VCat;
watch VCat;
persuade VCat;
promise VCat;

think+v:think #;
think+v+%0+agr+past+tense:thought #;
think+v+1+agr+pres+tense:thinks #;
think+v+%0+agr+pres+tense:think #;

LEXICON VCat

+v:0 VInf;
+v:0 #;

LEXICON VInf

+%0+agr+pres+tense:0  #;
+1+agr+pres+tense:^s  #;
+%0+agr+past+tense:^ed #;

LEXICON Det

the   DCat;

LEXICON DCat

+D:0 #;

LEXICON Compl

that CCat;

LEXICON CCat
+C:0 #;

LEXICON Prep

to PCat;

LEXICON PCat
+P:0 #;

LEXICON WH

who+wh:who #;
whom+wh:whom #;
